District of Columbia statutes.
2-825

Installation of electrical facilities.

The Mayor is authorized to permit the Inaugural Committee to install suitable overhead conductors and install suitable lighting or other electrical facilities, with adequate supports, for illumination or other purposes. If it should be necessary to place wires for illuminating or other purposes over any park or reservation in the District of Columbia, such placing of wires and their removal shall be under the supervision of the official in charge of said park or reservation. Such conductors with their supports shall be removed within 5 days after the end of the inaugural period. The Mayor, or such other officials as may have jurisdiction in the premises, shall enforce the provisions of this chapter, take needful precautions for the protection of the public, and insure that the pavement of any street, sidewalk, avenue, or alley which is disturbed or damaged is restored to its previous condition. No expense or damage from the installation, operation, or removal of said temporary overhead conductors or said illumination or other electrical facilities shall be incurred by the United States or the District of Columbia, and the Inaugural Committee shall indemnify and save harmless the District of Columbia and the appropriate agency or agencies of the federal government against any loss or damage and against any liability whatsoever arising from any act of the Inaugural Committee or any agent, licensee, servant, or employee of the Inaugural Committee.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1050, ch. 974, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1805.
1973 Ed., § 1-1205.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.